en: Meat-based sauces
de: Fleischsoßen
es: Salsas con carne
fi: lihapohjaiset kastikkeet
fr: Sauces à la viande
hr: Umaci na bazi mesa
hu: Hús alapú szószok
it: Salse a base di carne
lt: Padažai su mėsa
nl: Vleessauzen, Jussauzen
pl: Sosy mięsne
pt: Molhos à base de carne
zh: 肉类酱汁

en: Pestos, Pesto sauces
xx: Pesto
bg: Песто
ca: Pestos, Salses Pesto, Salsa pesto
da: Pestoer
de: Pestos, Pesto Saucen
es: Pestos, Salsas Pesto, Salsa pesto
fi: pestot
fr: Sauces Pesto, Sauce pesto
he: ממרחי פסטו
hr: Pestos
hu: Pestók, Pestó szószok
ja: ペスト
lt: Pesto padažai
nl: Pestosauzen
ru: Песто
zh: 青酱

en: Red pestos, Red pesto sauces, Resto rosso sauces
xx: Pesto alla trapanese, Pesto alla siciliana, Pesto rosso
da: Røde pestoer
de: Rote Pestos, Rote Pesto Saucen
es: Pestos rojos, Pesto rojo
fr: Sauces Pesto Rosso, Pesto rouge, pestos rouges, Sauce pesto rosso
hr: Crveni pestos
hu: Piros pestók, Piros pestó szószok
lt: Raudonieji pesto padažai
nl: Rode pestosauzen
pl: Pesto czerwone, Czerwone pesto

en: Green pestos
xx: Pesto alla genovese, Pesto genovese, Pesto verde
da: Grønne pestoer
de: Pesto alla Genovese, Pestos nach Genueser Art, Grüne Pestos
es: Pestos verdes
fi: vihreät pestot
fr: Pestos au basilic, Pesto au basilic
hr: Zeleni pestos
hu: Zöld pestók, Zöld pestó szószok
nl: Groene pesto
pl: Pesto zielone, Zielone pesto

en: Pesto alla calabrese
xx: Pesto alla calabrese

en: Vegan pestos
da: Veganske pestoer
sv: Veganska pesto

en: Pizza sauces, Topping sauce for pizza
de: Pizzasoßen, Pizzasoße, Pizzasaucen, Pizzasauce
es: Salsas para pizzas, Salsas para pizza
fi: pizza-kastikkeet
fr: Sauces pour pizzas, Sauce pour pizza
hr: Umaci za pizzu
hu: Pizza szószok
it: Salsa per la pizza
ja: ピザソース
lt: Picos padažai
nl: Pizzasauzen
pl: Sosy do pizzy, Sos do pizzy

en: Cream sauces for pizzas, Cream sauce for pizza base
fr: Sauces à la crème pour pizzas, Base de pizza à la crème

en: Tomato sauces for pizzas, Tomato sauce for pizza base
fr: Sauces tomate pour pizzas, Base de pizza tomatée
hr: Umak od rajčice za podlogu za pizzu
lt: Pomidorų padažai picos pagrindui

en: Provençale sauces, Provençal sauces, Provencale sauces, Provencal sauces
es: Salsas provenzales
fr: Sauces provençales
hr: Provansalski umaci
lt: Provanso padažai
nl: Provencaalse sauzen

fr: Sauces puttanesca
en: Puttanesca sauces

en: Tomato sauces with onions
bg: Доматен сос с лук
da: Tomatsovser med løg
fr: Sauces tomate aux oignons
hr: Umaci od rajčice s lukom
lt: Pomidorų padažai su svogūnais
nl: Tomatensauzen met ui
sv: Tomatsåser med lök

en: Soy sauces, Soya sauces, Shoyu, Soy sauce
bg: Соев сос
de: Sojasoßen, Sojasoße, Sojasaucen, Sojasauce
es: Salsas de soja, Shoyu
fi: soijakastikkeet
fr: Sauces au soja, Sauces soja, Sauces de soja, Sauce de soja, sauce au soja, sauce soja, Shoyu
hr: Umaci od soje
it: Salsa di soia
ja: 醤油
lt: Sojų padažai
nl: Sojasauzen, Ketjaps
pl: Sosy sojowe, Sos sojowy
ru: Соевые соусы, Соевый соус, Соус соевый, Соусы соевые

fr: Sauces au soja salées, Sauces soja salées, Sauces de soja salées, Sauce au soja salée, Sauce soja salée, Sauce de soja salée
hr: slani sojini umaci, slani sojini umak
nl: Zoute sojasauzen

fr: Sauces au soja sucrées, Sauces soja sucrées, Sauces de soja sucrée, Sauce au soja sucrée, Sauce soja sucrée, Sauce de soja sucrée
nl: Zoete sojasauzen

en: Tamaris, Tamari sauces
es: Tamaris, Tamari
fr: Tamaris, Tamari, Sauces Tamari, Sauce Tamari
hr: Tamaris
it: Tamaris
ja: たまり醤油
nl: Tamari sojasauzen

en: Sukiyaki sauces
fr: Sauces Sukiyaki

en: Sofritos
es: Sofritos
fr: Sofregits, Sofrits
hr: Sofritos
nl: Sofrito

en: Sweet and sour sauces
de: Süßsaure Soßen, Süß-sauere Soßen
es: Salsas agridulces
fi: hapanimeläkastikkeet
fr: Sauces aigre-douces, Sauces à l'aigre-douce, Sauce aigre douce
hr: Slatki i kiseli umaci
lt: Saldžiarūgščiai padažai
nl: Zoetzuursauzen
pl: Sosy słodko-kwaśne

en: Meal sauces, Stir in sauces
sv: Måltidssåser